Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1 General Provisions
6-54-120. Municipal clerk certifications.

After July 1, 1998, a municipality that employs an officer or employee responsible for exercising any of the duties of municipal clerk or municipal recorder, as specified in the municipal charter, or any of the duties listed in subdivision (a)(1), shall have one (1) such person obtain certification upon meeting the qualifications for certification established by the secretary of state; provided, that a municipality shall have four (4) years to ensure that any officer or employee responsible for exercising any of the duties of municipal clerk or recorder and who was hired after July 1, 1994, meets those qualifications.

Examples of duties commonly exercised by municipal recorders and clerks include, but are not limited to:

Taking the minutes and keeping a record of business transacted at meetings of the legislative body;

Preserving the minutes in permanent form;

Acting as custodian of and preserving the public records of the city, including original copies of ordinances, minutes of the legislative body, contracts, bonds, title deeds, and other official papers, records and documents; and

Providing copies and certifying copies of official records, papers and documents.

In municipalities where more than one (1) person is responsible for exercising the duties listed in subdivision (a)(1), one (1) person in each municipality shall obtain certification. More than one (1) municipal employee or officer may become certified.

Any person who is licensed to practice law in the state of Tennessee and who satisfies the continuing legal education requirement in Supreme Court Rule 21 is exempt from the certification requirements of this section. Any person who is a certified public accountant holding a certificate as provided in § 62-1-106 or § 62-1-107 is exempt from the certification requirements of this section. Any person who has been appointed or is acting in the capacity of a city manager or administrator and who possesses a Masters of Arts degree in public administration shall also be exempt from the certification requirements of this section. In addition, any person is exempt from initial certification if such person has served as both a city judge and city recorder for at least twenty-five (25) years.

The secretary of state shall establish the qualifications for certification in rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in consultation with the Tennessee association of municipal clerks and recorders. Certification requires at least one hundred (100) hours of education courses.

The required education hours may include a credit of twenty-five (25) hours for an Associate of Arts or Science degree and a credit of fifty (50) hours for a Bachelor of Arts or Science degree; provided, that such credit is given for only one (1) degree.

In addition, completion of any course approved for continuing education credit may be applied to satisfy the required education hours.

The secretary of state shall recognize and accept certification from the International Institute of Municipal Clerks as satisfying the certification requirements of this part.

To retain certification, a certified officer or employee shall be required to attend a minimum of eighteen (18) hours of continuing education courses every three (3) years.

Any courses offered in conjunction with the University of Tennessee municipal technical advisory service and center for government training shall be offered in each grand division of the state.

Hours of training may be earned toward certification by using self-teaching computer programs as approved by the secretary of state.

This section shall be optional for any municipality having a population of less than one thousand five hundred (1,500), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Any such municipality may by ordinance require its recorder or clerk, or both, to obtain certification as required by this section.

Acts 1994, ch. 648, § 1; 1996, ch. 625, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 114, § 1; 1998, ch. 589, § 1; 1998, ch. 710, § 1; 2003, ch. 48, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

6-54-121. Development by municipalities for resale prohibited — Exceptions.

No municipality shall have, or acquire by private act or amendment to a charter, the power to acquire undeveloped real property for the purpose of development or subdivision into residential lots for resale.

Subsection (a) shall not affect any power that a municipality may have by general law or private act to engage in slum clearance or the redevelopment of blighted areas, or the construction or development of subsidized low or moderate income housing under state or federal law.

As used in this section “municipality” includes incorporated towns or cities, metropolitan governments, or counties.

Acts 1996, ch. 788, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability and legislative history, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

6-54-122. Eminent domain — Notice to counties — Vote by county legislative body — Review.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a municipality, in exercising its powers of eminent domain pursuant to title 29, chapters 16 and 17, or in any other manner provided by law, to condemn unincorporated territory that is located in any county where any part of the municipality was not located prior to May 1, 1995, shall first notify, in writing, the county clerk of the county where the territory proposed to be taken for public use is located. The county clerk shall immediately send a copy of the notice to the county mayor and to the members of the county legislative body. The county legislative body shall approve or disapprove the municipality's proposed action no later than its next regularly scheduled meeting and may hold a special meeting for this purpose. If the county legislative body takes no action or approves the municipality's action, the municipality may proceed with its proposed action. If the county legislative body disapproves the municipality's action, the municipality may not proceed, except as provided in this section. This section shall not apply to any condemnation proceedings for territories that lie within the corporate boundaries of the municipality, nor to any condemnation proceedings in a county where any part of the municipality was located prior to May 1, 1995.

A vote of disapproval by the county legislative body shall not be arbitrary or capricious, but shall be based upon its reasonable consideration of the impact of the proposed action upon the county, including, but not limited to, consideration of any materials or evidence that may be presented to it at such meeting by any interested party, including the municipality proposing such action.

The action of the county legislative body in connection with the disapproval of any order of any kind may be reviewed by statutory writ of certiorari, with the court examining the action to see if it meets the standard of subsection (b). The municipality shall address the petition of certiorari to the chancery court of the county in which the territory in question is located. The trial of the case shall be expedited by giving it priority over all cases on the trial docket, except workers' compensation cases. If the court finds that the county legislative body's disapproval was arbitrary or capricious, it shall enter an order allowing the municipality to proceed.

Immediately upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the county legislative body making the disapproval shall cause to be made, certified and forwarded to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings before the county legislative body.

This section shall be the sole remedy and exclusive method of review of any action that may have been taken by the county legislative body. The Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure shall be applicable in connection with such review. Any party dissatisfied with the decree of the court may, upon giving bond as required in other cases, appeal, where the cause shall be heard upon the transcript of the records from the chancery court.

This section shall not apply to the exercise of the powers of eminent domain by a municipality insofar as such powers are exercised to acquire interests in property to be used directly or indirectly for the benefit of the operations of a municipal utility including, without limitation, electric utility services, gas utility services, water utility services, sewer utility services, storm water management services, telecommunication utility services, and any facility or equipment deemed by the municipal utility to be necessary for the provision of any one (1) or more of the foregoing utility services.

This section shall not apply to the exercise of the power of eminent domain by a metropolitan government that:

Is acquiring interests in property to be used directly or indirectly in the provision of utility service or storm water management;

Is undertaking a joint public project that is approved by the county or counties through an interlocal agreement or other contract; or

Undertakes a public project or improvement to be located on property contiguous to the county's boundary, but primarily inside the metropolitan government, and additional land located within the county is needed to satisfy zoning requirements.

This section shall not apply to or affect in any way the exercise of the power of eminent domain governed by title 42, chapter 5, affecting county and municipal airports.

This section shall not apply to any project jointly sponsored by a municipality and the governing body of the county in which the proposed project is to be located.

Acts 1996, ch. 1052, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated—state takings. 49 A.L.R.5th 769.

6-54-123. Personnel policies.

On or before July 1, 1998, any municipality, incorporated before June 13, 1997, that has not adopted a personnel policy by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise, shall adopt such a policy that applies fairly, impartially, and uniformly, to the extent practicable, to each department of the municipal government. The policy may include, but not be limited to, hiring procedures, benefits, personnel rules and regulations, fair and reasonable complaint conferences and hearing procedures for employees dismissed, demoted, or suspended; procedures for compliance with federal laws such as, but not limited to, the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), and the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.); drug and alcohol testing policy; and a sexual harassment policy. The policy may not grant a property right or contract right to the job to any employee. The municipality may work with the University of Tennessee Municipal Technical Advisory Service, in cooperation with the Tennessee Municipal League, in developing its policy. A copy of the resolution or ordinance adopting the policy, or its caption, shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality before final adoption of the policy. A copy of the personnel policy as required by this section shall be kept in the office of the city recorder or clerk and made available to an employee on request. Any municipality incorporated after June 13, 1997, shall have two (2) years after incorporation to adopt and implement a personnel policy pursuant to this section.

Acts 1997, ch. 428, § 1.

6-54-124. Community development block grant funds — Payments in lieu of property taxes — Reports of expenditures.

A municipality that is the recipient of community development block grant funds shall make a report concerning the expenditure of such funds. The municipality shall place a copy of such report in the main branch of the public library located within the boundaries of the municipality. A municipality that permits access to public information through the Internet may also place such report on the municipality's homepage.

A municipality or an industrial development corporation formed by such municipality that is a party to an agreement that involves a payment in lieu of property taxes shall make a report concerning such agreement and the expenditure of such funds. The municipality shall place a copy of such report in the main branch of the public library located within the boundaries of the municipality. A municipality that permits access to public information through the Internet may also place such report on the municipality's homepage.

Acts 1997, ch. 447, § 1.

6-54-125. Municipal officials and employees prohibited from purchasing surplus property, except at public auction — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any municipal official or employee to purchase from the municipality any property declared to be surplus by the municipality, except by bid at public auction during the tenure of such person's office or employment, or for six (6) months thereafter.

A purchaser who violates this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1998, ch. 1043, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

6-54-126. Zoning limitations on agricultural land.

For any land that is used for agricultural purposes as of May 10, 1998, a municipality may not use its zoning power to interfere in any way with the use of such land for agricultural purposes as long as the land is used for agricultural purposes.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 22; 1999, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 1101, as enacted, first carried the text of this section as uncodified legislation. The section was later codified by Acts 1999, ch. 235.

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of municipalities to charge a fee for building permits for agricultural land. OAG 10-12, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (1/28/10).

6-54-127. Graffiti removal — Funds and manpower.

For the purpose of promoting the public safety, health, welfare, convenience and enjoyment, to protect the public investment in public property, and to preserve and enhance the scenic beauty of property visible from publicly owned property, the general assembly hereby finds and declares that graffiti constitutes a public nuisance that may be abated in accordance with this section, or by civil actions or suits brought in the circuit or chancery courts as provided by the general law. The authority provided in this section is permissive and not mandatory and may be exercised by a municipality in accordance with this section upon the adoption of an ordinance.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Advertising” means any letter, word, name, number, symbol, slogan, message, drawing, picture, writing, or other mark of any kind lawfully placed on property by an owner or tenant of the property, or an agent of such owner or tenant, for the purpose of promoting products or services or conveying information to the public;

“Graffiti” means, without limitation, any letter, word, name, number, symbol, slogan, message, drawing, picture, writing, or other mark of any kind visible to the public that is drawn, painted, chiseled, scratched or etched on a rock, tree, wall, bridge, fence, gate, building or other structure; provided, this definition shall not include advertising or any other letter, word, name, number, symbol, slogan, message, drawing, picture, writing, or other mark of any kind lawfully placed on property by an owner of the property, a tenant of the property, by an authorized agent for such owner or tenant, or unless otherwise approved by the owner or tenant;

“Municipality,” includes incorporated cities and towns and metropolitan governments;

“Publicly owned property” means the property owned or controlled by a federal, state or local governmental entity, including, but not limited to, public parks, streets, roads and sidewalks; and

“Tenant” means any person shown by the records of the register of deed's office as a lessee of property, or any person lawfully in actual physical possession of property.

Any municipality may use municipal funds to remove graffiti or other inscribed material from publicly owned real or personal property or privately owned real or personal property visible from publicly owned property and located within the municipality and to replace or repair publicly owned property or privately owned property visible from publicly owned property within that municipality that has been defaced with graffiti or other inscribed material.

The municipality shall be authorized to remove the graffiti or other inscribed material, or, if the graffiti or other inscribed material cannot be removed cost-effectively, to repair or replace that portion of the property that was defaced, but not the painting, repair, or replacement of other parts of the property that were not defaced by graffiti, and may designate by ordinance an administrative officer or administrative body to perform the functions set forth in this section.

The removal, repair, or replacement may be performed, in the case of publicly owned real or personal property, only after securing the consent of the public entity having jurisdiction over the property.

In the case of privately owned real or personal property visible from publicly owned property, the removal, repair, or replacement may be performed after the property owner and the tenant, if any, give their written consent to the municipality authorizing removal of the graffiti.

The municipality may also use municipal funds for anti-graffiti education, operate a “hot line” for the purpose of receiving reports of unlawful application of graffiti on public or private property, and operate a program of financial reward, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), for information leading to the arrest and conviction of any person who unlawfully applies graffiti to any public property or private property visible from the public right-of-way.

Removal of graffiti by a municipality pursuant to this section shall be performed at the sole expense of the municipality. In removing the graffiti, the municipality shall consult with the property owner or tenant and arrive at a method of removal that does not result in further damage or harm to the property. If the municipality and the property owner or tenant are unable to agree on a method of removal, the municipality shall not remove the graffiti. In removing the graffiti, the municipality shall restore the property as nearly as possible to the condition as it existed immediately prior to the graffiti being placed on the property. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or limit the power of the municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement under any procedure now provided by law for the abatement of any public nuisances.

In removing, repairing or replacing the real or personal property pursuant to this section, the municipality or county may use the services of persons ordered to perform those services by a general sessions, criminal or juvenile court.

The municipality and its officers, employees, agents, volunteers and persons ordered to perform nuisance removal by a general sessions, criminal or juvenile court shall not be liable for any damages or loss of property:

Due to the removal of graffiti performed pursuant to this section;

Due to the repair or replacement of the property performed pursuant to this section; or

Due to the failure by the municipality to remove, repair or replace property defaced by graffiti pursuant to this section.

Acts 1999, ch. 347, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. A metropolitan government has the authority to enact an ordinance as part of its building code that prohibits persons from placing graffiti on building exteriors and that requires property owners to remove graffiti from their buildings and, within constitutional limitations, to limit the style of painting that a property owner can have on the exterior of a building, OAG 01-137, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 144 (9/4/01).

Performing graffiti removal as community service. OAG 14-02, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/14).

6-54-128. Criminal records of vehicle operators transporting the public — Costs of investigation.

In counties having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, it is hereby declared that access to criminal conviction histories by municipalities that choose to license and regulate persons operating vehicles for hire, or choose to employ persons to transport members of the public, and further choose to disqualify an applicant for a license or a permit, or refuse to hire a person because of a conviction for any specified criminal offense serves a law enforcement purpose. Municipalities that choose to license and regulate persons operating vehicles for hire, or choose to employ persons to transport members of the public, and further choose to disqualify an applicant for a license or a permit, or refuse to hire a person because of a conviction for any specified criminal offense shall require that all applicants for a license or permit to operate a vehicle for hire or employ persons to transport citizens submit a full set of fingerprints and undergo a criminal conviction records investigation through the political subdivision, the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation in accordance with subsection (b).

Upon receipt of an application, the municipality shall:

Conduct a criminal conviction record investigation through computer terminals or other means of access to criminal convictions maintained by the municipality, the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation; and

Forward the applicant's fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation, which shall verify the identity of the applicant and conduct a criminal conviction record investigation and forward the results of that investigation to the requesting entity.

If no disqualifying record is identified at the political subdivision or state level, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for verification of the applicant's identity and the federal bureau of investigation shall conduct a criminal conviction record investigation using the fingerprints.

The results of criminal conviction record investigations shall be used for the limited purpose of determining the suitability of the applicant for issuance of the license or permit or the suitability of the person for employment with the municipality.

Fingerprints shall be submitted on authorized fingerprint cards or by electronic, machine-readable data, or other suitable technological means.

Any cost incurred in conducting such criminal conviction records investigations shall be paid by the governmental entity making the request. Governmental entities may include such cost as part of any fee charged for the processing of the applicant's license or permit.

Acts 1999, ch. 447, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 211, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-54-129. Requirements prior to employment with municipality.

Prior to employment with a municipality, the municipality may require all persons to:

Agree to the release of all investigative records to the municipality for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of criminal violation information contained on an employment application; and

Supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation. In addition, to the extent permitted by federal law, and at the discretion of the municipality, a check of such prints may be made against records maintained by the federal bureau of investigation.

Any costs incurred by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, as appropriate, in conducting such investigations of applicants shall be paid by the municipality requesting such investigation and information; provided, that the municipality may require an applicant to pay such costs if the applicant is offered and accepts a position with such municipality. Payment of such costs is to be made in accordance with § 38-6-103.

A municipality may establish the job titles or classifications to which the requirements of this section apply; provided, however, that such classifications shall not supersede any mandatory fingerprint-based criminal history background requirements that may be applicable for any person who is seeking employment in a position in any program subject to licensure, approval or certification by any state agency.

Acts 2000, ch. 693, § 1.

Cross-References. Requirements prior to employment with county, § 5-1-126.

6-54-130. Amateur radio service.

A municipality, including a city and lesser incorporated area, or a county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that does not comply with the ruling of the federal communications commission in “In the Matter of Federal preemption of state and local regulations pertaining to Amateur radio facilities,” 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985), or a regulation related to amateur radio service adopted under 47 CFR chapter I, subchapter D, part 97.

If a municipality adopts an ordinance involving the placement, screening or height of an amateur antenna based on health, safety, or aesthetic conditions, the ordinance shall:

Reasonably accommodate amateur radio communications; and

Represent the minimal practicable regulation to accomplish the municipality's or county's purpose.

Acts 2003, ch. 63, § 1.

6-54-131. [Repealed.]

Acts 2003, ch. 113, § 1; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 1, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-54-131 concerned restrictions on creation of municipal courts with concurrent general sessions court jurisdiction.

6-54-132. Wheel immobilizers.

Municipalities shall be authorized to regulate the commercial use of wheel immobilizers to disable vehicles.

Acts 2008, ch. 722, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 722, § 1 purported to add a new section as § 6-54-1001. The section was redesignated as § 6-54-132 by the code commission.

Acts 2008, ch. 1049, § 1 purported to add a new section as § 6-54-132. Since Acts 2008, ch. 722, § 1 added § 6-54-132, Acts 2008, ch. 1049, § 1 was added as § 6-54-133.

6-54-133. Design review commission — Authority — Members — Appeal of decisions.

Any municipality may create a design review commission (DRC) having the authority to develop general guidelines for the exterior appearance of nonresidential property, multiple family residential property, and any entrance to a nonresidential development within the municipality. The municipal governing body may designate the planning commission as the DRC. When the municipality creates a separate DRC, the mayor shall appoint the members of the DRC from residents of the municipality and shall strive to ensure that the membership is representative of the municipality as a whole, including, if possible, members with either architectural or engineering knowledge, or any other person having experience in nonresidential building. Any property owner affected by the guidelines may appeal a decision of the DRC to the municipality's planning commission or, if there is no planning commission or if the municipality has designated the planning commission as the DRC, to the municipality's governing body.

Acts 2008, ch. 1049, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 1049, § 1 purported to add a new section as § 6-54-132. Since Acts 2008, ch. 722, § 1 added § 6-54-132, Acts 2008, ch. 1049, § 1 was added as § 6-54-133.

6-54-134. Sale of surplus property by public auction includes sale by Internet auction.

When a municipality is required by any law to sell surplus property by public auction, “public auction” includes the sale by Internet auction.

Acts 2009, ch. 173, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 508, § 1-3 purported to add a new section concerning allowing pet dogs in outdoor dining areas at restaurants as § 6-54-134. Since Acts 2009, ch. 173, § 4 added § 6-54-134, ch. 508 was added as § 6-54-135.

6-54-135. Allowing pet dogs in outdoor dining areas at restaurants.

For purposes of this section, “pet dog” means a dog other than a service or guide dog assisting a handicapped person.

Notwithstanding any other prohibition to the contrary, certain jurisdictions, as provided in subsection (c), may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the presence of pet dogs in outdoor dining areas of restaurants, if the ordinance provides for adequate controls to ensure compliance with the Tennessee Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled in title 53, chapter 1, and any other applicable statutes and ordinances. An ordinance enacted under this section shall provide for a permitting process to authorize individual restaurants to permit dogs as provided in this section and to charge applicants and authorized restaurants a reasonable permit fee as the ordinance may establish. Additionally, the ordinance shall provide that:

No pet dog shall be present in the interior of any restaurant or in any area where food is prepared;

The restaurant shall have the right to refuse to serve the owner of a pet dog if the owner fails to exercise reasonable control over the pet dog or the pet dog is otherwise behaving in a manner that compromises or threatens to compromise the health or safety of any person present in the restaurant;

All public food service establishment employees shall wash their hands promptly after touching, petting or otherwise handling a pet dog. Employees shall be prohibited from touching, petting or otherwise handling pet dogs while serving food or beverages or handling tableware or before entering other parts of the public food service establishment;

Employees and patrons shall be instructed that they shall not allow pet dogs to come into contact with serving dishes, utensils, tableware, linens, paper products or any other items involved in food service operations;

Patrons shall keep their pet dogs on a leash at all times and keep their pet dogs under reasonable control;

Pet dogs shall not be allowed on chairs, tables or other furnishings;

Accidents involving pet dog waste shall be cleaned immediately and the area sanitized with an approved product. A kit with the appropriate materials for this purpose shall be kept near the designated outdoor area;

A sign or signs reminding employees and patrons of the applicable rules shall be posted on the premises in a manner and place as determined by the local permitting authority; and

Pet dogs shall not be permitted to travel through indoor or nondesignated portions of the public food service establishment, and ingress and egress to the designated outdoor portions of the public food establishment shall not require entrance into or passage through any indoor area of the food establishment.

This section shall apply in a municipality with a population of at least one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent census.

This section shall also apply in a county with a population of at least one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent census.

This section shall also apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent census, of:

not less than nor more than

5,500 5,600

11,369 11,450

14,300 14,400

16,600 16,700

38,200 38,300

39,200 39,300

48,000 48,100

56,700 56,800

71,100 71,200

105,800 105,900

Acts 2009, ch. 508, §§ 1-3.

Code Commission Notes.

On May 7, 2009, the senate adopted an amendment that included counties with a population of not less than 12,300 nor more than 12,368 to the counties to which this section applies pursuant to subdivision (c)(3). On June 11, 2009, the house of representatives adopted an amendment that would have added a new subsection to this section, under which the section would not apply to any county having a population of not less than 12,300 nor more than 12,368. The senate concurred in that amendment on June 12, 2009. Because the house of representatives amendment removed the authorization for counties within that population range added by the senate amendment, and the senate concurred in that action, no language regarding such counties was codified.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 508, §§ 1-3 purported to add this section as § 6-54-134. Acts 2008, ch. 173, § 4 added § 6-54-134; therefore, the code commission added this section as § 6-54-135.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-54-136. Archives and record management fee.

Any city or town may establish and collect, through all entities creating public records, except for the office of the county register, an archives and record management fee not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) per record filed.

Any city or town may establish and collect through the clerks of court, an archives and record management fee not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) per public record for the purpose of initiating a legal proceeding.

Funds collected though these fees must be designated exclusively for duplicating, storing and maintaining any records required by law to be permanently kept.

Acts 2009, ch. 520, § 3; 2010, ch. 1101, § 2.

6-54-137.
Protection from infringement of name of municipality and any visual images adopted by municipality.

Any municipality has the exclusive right to use:

The full corporate name of the municipality as stated in the municipality's charter or as otherwise officially adopted by the municipality; and

Any seal, insignia, flag, coat of arms, emblem, sign, logo or other visual image that has been formally adopted by the municipality.

A municipality may file a civil action against a party who, without the consent of the municipality, uses:

Any visual image described in subdivision (a)(2) for the purpose of trade or commerce, to induce the sale of any goods or services, or to promote any public exhibition, performance, competition or similar activity; or

The name of the municipality as described in subdivision (a)(1), any visual image described in subdivision (a)(2), or any words, combination of words or visual representation tending to cause confusion or mistake, to deceive, or to falsely suggest a connection with or endorsement by the municipality. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a variation of the name of the municipality may be used by any organization composed of employees of the municipality.

In the event that the actions of any person give rise to a cause of action pursuant to subsection (b), the municipality may seek to enjoin the manufacture, use, display or sale of a protected name or image, and any court of competent jurisdiction may grant an injunction to restrain such manufacture, use, display or sale as such court may deem just and reasonable. Upon finding that a defendant has violated a municipality's exclusive rights of use pursuant to this section, the court may order that the defendant pay to such municipality all profits derived from the unauthorized manufacture, use, display or sale and all damages suffered by reason of such acts. If the court finds that the defendant's acts constitute a willful or knowing violation, or that the defendant otherwise acted in bad faith, the court, in its discretion, may enter judgment in favor of the municipality in an amount not to exceed three (3) times the amount of the defendant's profits and the municipality's damages, plus reasonable attorneys' fees.

The enumeration of any right or remedy in this section shall not affect a municipality's right to prosecute an offender under any other law of this state.

Any municipal mayor or mayor's designee may authorize, in writing, contributors, suppliers of goods and services, or other third parties to use the name of the municipality as described in subdivision (a)(1) or a visual image as described in subdivision (a)(2); provided, that such authorization shall not be granted or denied in an arbitrary or capricious manner.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, any business entity or civic organization that was using the corporate or officially adopted name of any municipality in such entity's or organization's own name immediately prior to July 1, 2010, shall be permitted to continue such use whether or not the municipality that claims an exclusive right to use such name consents to the use of such name by the entity or organization so long as the entity or organization maintains its legal existence and the use of such name by the entity or organization is continuous.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit any elected municipal official from using the name or visual image of the municipality in the performance of such official's duties.

Acts 2010, ch. 847, § 1.

6-54-138. Changing the date by ordinance of municipal elections to coincide with general election.

Notwithstanding any private act of a municipality to the contrary, the legislative body of a municipality may by ordinance change the date of municipal elections to coincide with the August or November general election. The ordinance changing the election date shall provide for the extension of the terms of members of the legislative body of the municipality necessary to meet the election date, but no term may be extended for more than two (2) years beyond its regular expiration date. If an action is taken pursuant to this subsection (a), the presiding officer of the legislative body shall file a certified copy of the ordinance with the state coordinator of elections.

Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which an elected official was selected.

If the legislative body of a municipality changes the date of municipal elections pursuant to subsection (a), the legislative body may at a later date change the election date back to what such date was prior to moving the election date to coincide with the August or November general election. The legislative body may only make a change under this subsection (c) one (1) time. Terms of incumbent members of the legislative body shall not be abridged to accomplish an election date change under this subsection (c); however, members elected at a date change pursuant to this subsection (c) may take office at a later date so as to not abridge terms of incumbent members of the legislative body. If such members take office at a later date, their term may be abridged due to such members having to take office at the later date.

Acts 2010, ch. 1008, § 4.